Maine, session 132, LD108.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §509, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Release of information about military status; suicide reporting and prevention.
Upon request by an authorized representative of the Department of the Attorney General,
Office of Chief Medical Examiner in the conduct of official duties, the bureau may release
information regarding a deceased person's military service to the Office of Chief Medical
Examiner for the purposes of suicide reporting and prevention.
Page 1 - 132LR0138(04)